Texas statutes.
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGE CODE

TITLE 3. LICENSES AND PERMITS

SUBTITLE A. PERMITS

CHAPTER 15. DISTILLER'S AGENT

Sec. 15.01. AUTHORIZED ACTIVITIES. (a) A distiller's agent may:

(1) represent the holder of a distiller's and rectifier's permit;

(2) solicit and take orders from a holder of a wholesaler's permit for the sale of distilled spirits manufactured by the permit holder represented by the agent;

(3) conduct free distilled spirits tastings for consumers on the premises of the holder of a package store permit; and

(4) provide samples or tastings of distilled spirits on a retailer's premises in accordance with Section 14.07.

(b) A person acting as an agent may only represent one permitted or licensed business at a time while soliciting or taking orders.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 451 (S.B. 828), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 792 (H.B. 1997), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 63, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 15.04. SOLICITATION FROM HOLDER OF MIXED BEVERAGE OR PRIVATE CLUB PERMIT. A distiller's agent may not solicit business directly or indirectly from a holder of a mixed beverage permit or a private club registration permit unless the distiller's agent is accompanied by the holder of a wholesaler's permit or the wholesaler's agent.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 451 (S.B. 828), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 64, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 15.05. UNAUTHORIZED REPRESENTATION. A distiller's agent in soliciting or taking orders for the sale of liquor may not represent that the agent is an agent of any person other than the person who employs the agent or who has authorized the agent to represent the person.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 451 (S.B. 828), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1359 (H.B. 1545), Sec. 65, eff. September 1, 2019.